Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202585-2615
First responder or eligible disabled person; tuition waiver; limitation.

A first responder or an eligible disabled person may receive a tuition waiver for up to five years if he or she otherwise continues to be eligible for participation under sections 85-2611 to 85-2614.

Laws 2025, LB608, § 8.